District of Columbia statutes.
34-914

Summary investigation.

Whenever the Commission shall believe that any rate or charge of any public utility may be unreasonable or unjustly discriminatory, or that any reasonable service is not supplied by a public utility, or that an investigation of any matter relating to any public utility should for any reason be made, it may, on its own motion, summarily investigate the same with or without notice.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 984, ch. 150, § 8, par. 44
May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 201(i), 47 DCR 1091

History

1981 Ed., § 43-615.
1973 Ed., § 43-414.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-107 substituted “rate or charge of any public utility” for “rate or charge”, and substituted “supplied by a public utility” for “supplied”.

Effect of Amendments